New Jersey, session 221, A5485.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Affiliate means any individual or entity that directly or indirectly controls, is under common control with, or is controlled by a public utility. Legal penalties means any payment made by a public utility for legal wrongdoing or otherwise improper action committed by the public utility or its affiliate. Public utility means the same as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, order, or regulation to the contrary, the Board of Public Utilities shall not approve a public utilitys request to recover the cost of legal penalties through the public utility rates charged to ratepayers after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.